Arkansas, session 2025, SB606.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 8, Chapter 9, Subchapter 4 is amended
to read as follows:
Subchapter 4 — Used Tire Recycling and Accountability Act Tire Management and
Recycling Act

8-9-401. Title — Legislative intent — Findings.
(a) This subchapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Used Tire
Recycling and Accountability Act” "Tire Management and Recycling Act".
(b) The purpose of this subchapter is to:
(1) Protect the public health and the state's environmental
quality by setting and implementing standards to be followed in the hauling,
*JMB421*
04-03-2025 14:05:38 JMB421

As Engrossed: S4/3/25 SB606
collection, storage, and recycling or disposal of recyclable tires, waste
tires, and used tires culled for resale; and
(2) Provide accountability and sustainability for used tire
programs by requiring use of the electronic uniform used tire manifest system
developed by the Division of Environmental Quality and business plans for
used tire programs;
(3) Equalize the application of fees for all tires removed from
rims; and
(4) Ensure that reimbursements for used tire programs are
related to the overall used tire program goals.
(c) The General Assembly finds that:
(1) If not properly managed, used tires pose a potential threat
to human health and safety and the environment because used tires:
(A) Are a known breeding habitat for mosquitoes and other
disease-transmitting vectors; and
(B) Pose substantial fire hazards;
(2) The state must have a used tire program for recyclable
tires, waste tires, and used tires culled for resale that is accountable,
effective, and efficient; and
(3) The primary goal of the used tire program this subchapter is
to recycle or put to beneficial use as many used tires as possible.

8-9-402. Definitions.
As used in this subchapter:
(1)(A) “Abatement” means proper removal of tires from a waste
tire site or from a tire retailer who can show the waste tire district failed
to pick up or remove tires from the location of the tire retailer in a
reasonable time frame to a permitted tire processor, to a site authorized by
the Division of Environmental Quality, or for use in a beneficial use
project.
(B) Abated tires are not abandoned or discarded;
(2) “Beneficial use” means using a tire or part of a tire:
(A) To make another product;
(B) To make a component material of another product;
(C) As a substitute for a commercial product or material;
or
04-03-2025 14:05:38 JMB421

As Engrossed: S4/3/25 SB606
(D) As a component to produce an alternative fuel for
commercial purposes;
(E) For civil engineering purposes; or
(F) For lightweight aggregate fill;
(2)(A) “Commercial generator” means a person who sells new tires
or provides delivery of new tires as part of fleet services to any one (1) or
more of the following:
(i) A municipality;
(ii) A county;
(iii) A state agency;
(iv) A federal agency;
(v) A school district;
(vi) A political subdivision of the state; or
(vii) A person who in the ordinary course of
business buys tires in bulk for use on commercial vehicles.
(B) “Commercial generator” does not include a tire
retailer;
(3) “Electronic uniform used tire manifest system” means an
administrative method developed by the Division of Environmental Quality
under § 8-9-407 that:
(A) Primarily uses an electronic application for the
submission and management of information related to the generation,
collection, transportation, distribution, and recycling, disposal, or resale
of each recyclable tire, waste tire, and used tire culled for resale
regulated under this subchapter;
(B) Secondarily may allow submission of used tire data
that is manifested using an equivalent paper documentation; and
(C) Records the origin, date of collection, date of
transfer, quantity, type, transporter, and destination for each recyclable
tire, waste tire, and used tire culled for resale regulated under this
subchapter;
(4)(A) “Extra-large tire” means a tire that, due to its size or
construction, is more difficult to process for recycling or disposal than a
large tire and costs substantially more to process than a large tire.
(B) “Extra-large tire” includes without limitation a tire
used, capable of being used, or designed to be used on any of the following
04-03-2025 14:05:38 JMB421

As Engrossed: S4/3/25 SB606
vehicles or equipment:
(i) A skid steer loader;
(ii) Excavation equipment;
(iii) A farm implement, including without limitation
a tractor;
(iv) A backhoe;
(v) A road grader;
(vi) Industrial equipment;
(vii) A skidder; or
(viii) A heavy duty truck used off-road for mining.
(C) “Extra-large tire” includes without limitation a wide-
base tire or extra-wide single tire;
(5) “Inter-district used tire program” means a program formed by
agreement of two (2) or more regional solid waste management boards to pool
resources of all regional solid waste management boards that are parties to
the agreement for the administration of one (1) consolidated used tire
program;
(6) “Large tire” means a tire with a load rating of “F” or
higher;
(7) “Load rating” means the system of trade designations that
identifies the weight-carrying capacity range of a tire;
(8)(A)(3)(A) “Operator” means a person who performs a function
that:
(i) Requires individual judgment; and
(ii) May directly affect the proper operation at one
(1) or more of the following:
(a) A tire collection center;
(b) A tire processing facility;
(c) A tire generator facility; or
(d) A waste tire monofill.
(B) “Operator” includes a person who performs a function
at a waste tire site.
(C) “Operator” does not include a person who exclusively
exercises general administrative supervision;
(9)(4) “Owner” means a person who holds legal title to property
where a tire collection center, tire processing facility, tire generator
04-03-2025 14:05:38 JMB421

As Engrossed: S4/3/25 SB606
facility, waste tire monofill, waste tire site, or other waste tire facility
exists;
(10)(5) “Person” means an individual, government entity, or any
other entity that is recognized by law with rights and duties;
(11) “Qualified entity” means an entity that demonstrates to the
division that the entity has the capability, experience, and resources to
operate and administer a used tire program in compliance with this
subchapter;
(12) “Recyclable tire” means a worn, damaged, or defective tire
that is recycled because it is no longer repairable, reusable, or suitable
for its original intended purpose;
(6) “Proceeds from tire retailer fees” means all moneys
collected and received by the Department of Finance and Administration under
this subchapter for tire retailer fees imposed under this subchapter and
interest and penalties on delinquent tire retailer fees;
(13)(7) “Recycle” means the systematic process of collecting,
sorting, decontaminating, and returning waste materials to commerce as
commodities for use, other beneficial use, or exchange;
(14)(A) “Small tire” means a tire that has a load rating lower
than “F”.
(B) “Small tire” includes a tire from any of the following
vehicles:
(i) An automobile;
(ii) A motorcycle; or
(iii) An all-terrain vehicle;
(15)(A)(8)(A) “Tire” means any one (1) or more of the following:
(i) A continuous, ring-shaped, removable cover made
of solid rubber, pneumatic rubber, or semipneumatic rubber that is installed
around a wheel rim; or
(ii) Any other round piece of equipment that is
attached or could be attached to a vehicle, tractor, or aircraft and has a
primary function of enabling surface mobility.
(B) “Tire” does not include a solid wheel rim with an
integral rubber covering or a tire used on a nonmotorized bicycle, golf cart,
or lawn mower;
(16)(9) “Tire collection center” means a site where tires are
04-03-2025 14:05:38 JMB421

As Engrossed: S4/3/25 SB606
collected from tire generators, tire transporters, or the public before being
recycled or disposed of by a used tire program;
(17)(A)(10)(A) “Tire generator” means a person who:
(i) Removes tires from rims for disposal or resale;
or
(ii) Stores used tires on or in property owned,
leased, or otherwise controlled by that person;
(iii) Sells new tires; or
(iv) Provides delivery of new tires as part of fleet
services.
(B) “Tire generator” includes without limitation:
(i) A tire retailer;
(ii) A tire wholesaler;
(iii) A tire transporter;
(iv) A tire manufacturer;
(v) A manufacturer of retreaded tires;
(vi) A new car dealer;
(vii) A used car dealer;
(viii) An auto repair shop; or
(ix) A salvage yard.
(C) “Tire generator” does not include a commercial
generator;
(18)(11) “Tire manufacturer” means a manufacturing operation
engaged in the final assembly of the basic components of a tire;
(19)(12) “Tire processing facility” means a site where equipment
is used to cut, chip, grind, or otherwise alter used tires;
(20)(A)(13)(A) “Tire retailer” means any one (1) or more of the
following:
(i) A person who is in the business of selling new
tires, used tires, or both new tires and used tires to the end consumer; or
(ii) A person who is in the business of or receives
compensation for removing tires from rims.
(B) “Tire retailer” does not include a person who sells
tires to another person exclusively for the purpose of resale if the
subsequent retail sale is subject to the fee fees imposed under § 8-9-404 or
a commercial generator;
04-03-2025 14:05:38 JMB421

As Engrossed: S4/3/25 SB606
(21)(14) “Tire transporter” means a person who is in the
business of or receives compensation for transferring used tires from one (1)
location to another location for collection, storage, processing, recycling,
disposal, reuse, or resale;
(15) “Uniform used tire manifest system” means an administrative
method developed by the division under § 8-9-407 that:
(A) For the management of information related to the
generation, collection, transportation, distribution, and recycling,
disposal, or resale of each recyclable tire, waste tire, and used tire culled
for resale regulated under this subchapter; and
(B) Records the origin, date of collection, date of
transfer, quantity, type, transporter, and destination for each recyclable
tire, waste tire, and used tire culled for resale regulated under this
subchapter;
(22)(A)(16)(A) “Used tire” means a tire that meets one (1) or
more of the following criteria:
(i) Is repairable or retreadable for its original
intended purpose;
(ii) Is reusable;
(iii) Is recyclable; or
(iv) Has been collected by a tire retailer or at a
tire collection center operated under this subchapter.
(B) “Used tire” includes without limitation a recyclable
tire, waste tire, and used tire culled for resale.
(C) “Used tire” does not include a tire being held for
ninety (90) days or less for the purpose of retreading or repairing the tire;
(23)(17) “Used tire culled for resale” means a tire that is
removed from the rim but is diverted from a tire collection center, tire
processing facility, or tire transporter with the intention of selling for
reuse;
(24) “Used tire program” means a program that receives funding
under this subchapter and is operated by:
(A) A regional solid waste management board; or
(B) An inter-district used tire program;
(25)(18) “Vehicle” means any piece of equipment that uses wheels
for surface mobility;
04-03-2025 14:05:38 JMB421

As Engrossed: S4/3/25 SB606
(26)(19) “Waste tire” means a worn, damaged, or defective tire,
or a tire remnant destined for disposal that is land disposed because it is
no longer repairable, reusable, or suitable for its original intended
purpose;
(27)(A)(20)(A) “Waste tire site” means a location where
unpermitted used tires are accumulated, whether loosely stored, compacted and
baled, or a combination of both loosely stored and compacted and baled.
(B) “Waste tire site” does not include:
(i) A location where only new tires are stored; or
(ii) A location that is authorized to store tires by
the division or rules promulgated by the Arkansas Pollution Control and
Ecology Commission; and
(28)(21) “Waste tires originating from a tire manufacturer”
means those new tires that originate from a tire assembly process and are
determined by the tire manufacturer to be either defective or unfit for use
on a vehicle; and
(29) “Wide-base tire” or “extra-wide single tire” means a tire
approximately four hundred fifty-five millimeters (455 mm) wide that is used
on a vehicle in which the front axle load exceeds the load capacity of a
truck tire.

8-9-403. Operation of waste tire sites — Requirements and prohibited
activities.
(a)(1) The owner or operator of any waste tire site shall provide the
Division of Environmental Quality and the applicable regional solid waste
management district with:
(A) Information concerning the waste tire site's location
and size and the approximate number of tires that are accumulated at the
waste tire site; and
(B) A written plan specifying a method and time schedule,
subject to approval by the division, for the removal, disposal, or recycling
of the tires.
(2) The owner or operator shall implement a written plan
approved by the division according to the written plan's schedule.
(b) A person shall not cause or permit the open burning of tires in
the state.
04-03-2025 14:05:38 JMB421

As Engrossed: S4/3/25 SB606
(c)(1) A person shall not maintain a waste tire site.
(2) It is illegal for any person to dispose of tires or portions
of tires in the state unless the tires or portions of tires are disposed of
for processing or collected for processing at a permitted tire processing
facility, a tire collection center, or a permitted solid waste disposal
facility.
(3)(A) Unless otherwise provided by law or rule, whole tires
shall not be deposited into a landfill or a waste tire monofill as a method
of final disposal unless shredded or split into sufficiently small parts to
assure their proper disposal.
(B) Unless otherwise provided by law or rule, only small
tires that have been processed by cutting, shredding, or splitting into
sufficiently small parts to assure proper disposal or small tires processed
by baling may be disposed of at a disposal site that has a permit issued for
a landfill designed and operated as a waste tire monofill.
(C) Suitable processed-tire materials may be used in the
construction of daily and intermediate cover systems for all landfills if the
use is:
(i) Authorized by the division;
(ii) Shown to not present a threat to human health
and the environment; and
(iii) Shown to control disease, vectors, fires,
odors, blowing litter, or scavenging.
(4) A person who leases, owns, or otherwise controls real
property may use tires in compliance with procedures approved by and rules
promulgated by the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission and
procedures approved by each district:
(A) For soil erosion abatement and drainage purposes; or
(B) To secure covers over silage, hay, straw, or
agricultural products.
(d) A tire processing facility permit or tire collection center
permit, or both, is required for:
(1) A tire retreading business where tires are kept on any real
property owned, leased, or otherwise controlled by the tire retreading
business;
(2) A person that in the ordinary course of business removes
04-03-2025 14:05:38 JMB421

As Engrossed: S4/3/25 SB606
tires from rims and the tires removed from rims are stored for more than
ninety (90) calendar days on any real property owned, leased, or otherwise
controlled by the person; or
(3) A tire retailer that is serving as a tire collection center
if recyclable tires, waste tires, or used tires culled for resale are kept on
any real property owned, leased, or otherwise controlled by the tire
retailer.
(e)(1) If disposed or recycled in the state, waste tires originating
from a tire manufacturer shall be disposed of at transported to a permitted
tire collection center or disposed of at a permitted tire processing facility
for a fee to be established by the permitted tire collection center or
permitted tire processing facility.
(2) Records of the disposition of the waste tires originating
from a tire manufacturer shall be maintained by that tire manufacturer for a
period of at least three (3) years and shall be available for review by the
division.

8-9-404. Rim removal fees — Import fees — Commercial generator Tire
retailer fees — Definitions.
(a)(1) There is imposed a rim removal fee upon the transaction of
removing a tire from a rim that is related to the sale of a replacement tire
by a tire retailer.
(2) The rim removal fee shall be charged by the tire retailer to
a person who:
(A) Purchases a replacement tire for a rim that
necessitates the removal of a different tire from the same rim; or
(B) Purchases the service of removal of a tire from a rim
and replacement with a tire that was not purchased from the tire retailer if
the person requesting the rim removal cannot show proof of payment of the rim
removal fee under this section for the replacement tire.
(3)(A) The rim removal fee shall be imposed at the rate of three
dollars ($3.00) for each new tire that replaces a tire removed from a rim and
one dollar ($1.00) for each used tire that replaces the tire removed from the
rim.
(B) Except for the rim removal fees imposed under this
section, a tire retailer shall not charge any other fee to a person who
04-03-2025 14:05:38 JMB421

As Engrossed: S4/3/25 SB606
purchases the service of removal of a tire from a rim.
(C) For any tires collected by a tire retailer, the tire
retailer shall ensure that the tires are transported by a licensed tire
transporter to a permitted tire collection center, a solid waste management
facility, a tire processing facility, or another tire retailer.
(D) The tire retailer shall account for each tire removed
from a rim in the manner prescribed by the Department of Finance and
Administration.
(E) Each tire retailer shall register with the department
and comply with all requirements related to collecting and reporting rim
removal fees.
(4) The rim removal fees imposed under this section shall be
added to the total cost charged by the tire retailer to the purchaser after
all applicable gross receipts or compensating use taxes on the tires have
been computed and shall be separately stated on the invoice or bill of sale.
(5)(A) The rim removal fees imposed under this section shall be
paid monthly to the Secretary of the Department of Finance and
Administration.
(B) However, the tire retailer may retain five percent
(5%) of the rim removal fee imposed under subdivision (a)(3)(A) of this
section for administrative costs.
(6)(A) The rim removal fees remitted under subdivision (a)(5)(A)
of this section shall be collected by the secretary and shall be subject to
the Arkansas Tax Procedure Act, § 26-18-101 et seq. and the business closure
procedures under § 26-18-1001 et seq.
(B)(i) Each tire retailer shall file a return with the
secretary on or before the twentieth of each month.
(ii) The return shall show the total rim removal
fees collected for each tire removed from the rim during the preceding
calendar month.
(iii) The tire retailer shall remit the rim removal
fees with the return.
(iv) The secretary shall prescribe the form and
contents of the return.
(b)(1) The department shall deposit the proceeds from rim removal fees
collected under subsection (a) of this section into the State Treasury as
04-03-2025 14:05:38 JMB421

As Engrossed: S4/3/25 SB606
special revenues to the credit of the following funds in the following
percentages:
(A) Ninety-three percent (93%) to be deposited into the
Used Tire Recycling Fund; and
(B) Seven percent (7%) to be deposited into the Division
of Environmental Quality Fee Trust Fund.
(2) As used in this section, “proceeds from rim removal fees”
means all moneys collected and received by the department under this section
for rim removal fees imposed under subsection (a) of this section and
interest and penalties on delinquent rim removal fees.
(c)(1)(A) There is imposed an import fee of one dollar ($1.00) on each
used tire that is imported into Arkansas.
(B) A person who imports a used tire shall be registered
with the department and comply with all requirements related to collecting
and reporting import fees.
(2) The import fee imposed under this subsection shall be paid
by the person who imports the used tire to the department in accordance with
the Arkansas Tax Procedure Act, § 26-18-101 et seq., the business closure
procedures under § 26-18-1001 et seq., and any rules promulgated by the
department.
(3)(A) The department shall deposit the proceeds from import
fees imposed under this subsection into the State Treasury as special
revenues to the credit of the following funds in the following percentages:
(i) Ninety-three percent (93%) to be deposited into
the Used Tire Recycling Fund; and
(ii) Seven percent (7%) to be deposited into the
Division of Environmental Quality Fee Trust Fund.
(B) As used in this section, “proceeds from import fees”
means all moneys collected and received by the department under this
subsection and interest and penalties on delinquent import fees.
(a)(1) A person who imports a used tire into this state shall be
responsible for legally hauling and disposing of or recycling the waste tires
and residuals.
(2) A tire retailer may collect and charge a fee for the cost of
legally hauling and disposing of or recycling the waste tires and residuals.
(d)(1)(b)(1) There is imposed a commercial generator tire retailer fee
04-03-2025 14:05:38 JMB421

As Engrossed: S4/3/25 SB606
upon the transaction of a commercial generator tire retailer selling or
delivering a new tire as part of fleet services.
(2) The commercial generator tire retailer fee shall be charged
by the commercial generator tire retailer to a person who in the ordinary
course of business is an end user that removes used tires from the rim and
replaces them with of a new tire.
(3)(A) The commercial generator tire retailer fee shall be
imposed at the rate of three dollars ($3.00) one dollar and fifty cents
($1.50) for each new tire that is sold or delivered to an end user that
removes used tires from the rim and replaces them with a new tire.
(B) Except for the commercial generator fees imposed under
this section, the commercial generator shall not charge any other fee to the
end user.
(C)(i)(B)(i) For any used tires collected by a commercial
generator tire retailer, the first transportation of the used tire from the
end user to the commercial generator's tire retailer's facility does not
require a licensed tire transporter.
(ii) Any subsequent transportation of the used tire
by the commercial generator tire retailer for recycling or disposal requires
a licensed tire transporter and shall be accounted for using the electronic
uniform used tire manifest system.
(D)(C) Each commercial generator tire retailer shall
register with the department Department of Finance and Administration and
comply with all requirements related to collecting and reporting commercial
generator tire retailer fees.
(4) The commercial generator tire retailer fees imposed under
this section shall be added to the total cost charged by the commercial
generator tire retailer to the end user after all applicable gross receipts
or compensating use taxes on the tires have been computed and shall be
separately stated on the invoice or bill of sale.
(5)(A) The commercial generator tire retailer fees imposed under
this section shall be paid monthly to the secretary department.
(B) However, the commercial generator tire retailer may
retain five percent (5%) two percent (2%) of the commercial generator tire
retailer fee imposed under subdivision (d)(3)(A) (b)(3)(A) of this section
for administrative costs.
04-03-2025 14:05:38 JMB421

As Engrossed: S4/3/25 SB606
(6)(A) The commercial generator tire retailer fees remitted in
subdivision (d)(5)(A) (b)(5)(A) of this section shall be collected by the
secretary department and shall be subject to the Arkansas Tax Procedure Act,
§ 26-18-101 et seq., and the business closure procedures under § 26-18-1001
et seq.
(B)(i)(a) Each commercial generator tire retailer shall
file a return with the secretary department on or before the twentieth of
each month.
(b) The return shall show the total commercial
generator tire retailer fees collected for each tire sold or delivered to the
end user during the preceding calendar month.
(c) The commercial generator tire retailer
shall remit the commercial generator tire retailer fees with the return.
(ii) The secretary department shall prescribe the
form and contents of the return.
(7)(A) The department shall deposit the proceeds from commercial
generator tire retailer fees collected under this subsection into the State
Treasury as special revenues to the credit of the following funds in the
following percentages:
(A) Ninety-three percent (93%) to be deposited into the
Used Tire Recycling Fund; and
(B) Seven percent (7%) to be deposited into the Division
of Environmental Quality Fee Trust Fund Waste Tire Abatement Fund.
(B) No more than five hundred thousand ($500,000)
annually, with an annual escalator not to exceed two percent (2%), shall be
transferred to the Division of Environmental Quality Fee Trust Fund to be
used for administration expenses.
(8) As used in this section, “proceeds from commercial generator
fees” means all moneys collected and received by the department under this
section for commercial generator fees imposed under this subsection and
interest and penalties on delinquent commercial generator fees.
(e)(1) It is the purpose and intent of this section that only one (1)
of the following fees imposed under this section be charged for the
transaction of removing a tire from a rim that is related to the sale of a
replacement tire:
(A) The rim removal fee; or
04-03-2025 14:05:38 JMB421

As Engrossed: S4/3/25 SB606
(B) The commercial generator fee.
(2) If a person establishes that he or she has paid one (1) of
the fees for a tire, the tire retailer or tire generator shall not charge an
additional fee for that tire.
(c)(1) If the balance of the Waste Tire Abatement Fund exceeds five
million dollars ($5,000,000), the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology
Commission may reduce the tire retailer fee up to fifty percent (50%).
(2) A decision to reduce the tire retailer fee under subdivision
(c)(1) of this section is effective for the fiscal year following the
commission’s decision.
(d)(1) If the Division of Environmental Quality is unable to locate
the person that is responsible for the waste tire site or compel the person
responsible for the waste tire site to remove the waste tires, the division
may use Waste Tire Abatement Fund moneys for the abatement of the waste tires
or offer a waste tire abatement grant to:
(A) A regional solid waste management district;
(B) A city;
(C) A county;
(D) A tire retailer that can prove that the waste tire
district failed to pick up or remove tires from the location of the tire
retailer in a reasonable time frame; or
(E) A planning and development district.
(2) If a waste tire abatement grant is awarded to a person
described in subdivision (d)(1) of this section, the person shall provide
manifests demonstrating ultimate disposal or recycling in conformity with §
8-9-403(c)(1).
(3) The division may deny an application for reimbursement of
waste tire site removal and delivery costs if the division determines that
the cost would result in insufficient moneys in the Waste Tire Abatement
Fund.

8-9-405. Used tire program reimbursements.
(a) The Division of Environmental Quality shall establish the Used
Tire Recycling and Accountability Program to:
(1) Reimburse used tire programs for used tire recycling and
disposal costs;
04-03-2025 14:05:38 JMB421

As Engrossed: S4/3/25 SB606
(2) Incentivize recycling used tires collected under this
subchapter;
(3) Provide accountability for the disbursement of moneys to
used tire programs; and
(4) Otherwise improve the sustainability of used tire programs.
(b) To be eligible for reimbursements under this subchapter, a used
tire program shall:
(1) Be included in the solid waste management system under § 8-
9-101 et seq. for each regional solid waste management district that the used
tire program serves;
(2) Have a used tire management plan for each regional solid
waste management district that the used tire program serves to include
without limitation a schedule for identification and cleanup of waste tire
sites that is updated until abatement of each identified waste tire site is
completed;
(3) Be included in each regional solid waste management
district's recycling program under § 8-9-203 that the used tire program
serves;
(4) If operated by a political subdivision of the state or other
public entity:
(A) Use the financial management system under § 14-21-101
et seq.;
(B) Comply with the county purchasing procedures under §
14-22-101 et seq.;
(C) Comply with the Arkansas County Accounting Law of
1973, § 14-25-101 et seq.; and
(D) Comply with the Local Fiscal Management Responsibility
Act, § 14-77-101 et seq.;
(5) Be operated in compliance with this subchapter and all other
laws and rules related to the administration of solid waste management
systems and recycling programs in Arkansas;
(6) Encourage the voluntary establishment of tire collection
centers at tire retailers, tire processing facilities, and solid waste
disposal facilities for the deposit of tires generated in the state;
(7) Provide the division with business plan information required
under § 8-9-408;
04-03-2025 14:05:38 JMB421

As Engrossed: S4/3/25 SB606
(8) Provide the division with all quarterly financial
information and progress reports related to § 8-9-409;
(9)(A) Establish tire collection centers within each county
served by the used tire program that accepts tires from tire retailers at no
charge if the tire retailer establishes that it:
(i) Collects the rim removal fee imposed under § 8-
9-404(a); and
(ii) Complies with the electronic uniform used tire
manifest system under § 8-9-407.
(B) The tire collection centers under this subdivision
(b)(9) may be at any one (1) or more of the following:
(i) A solid waste disposal facility;
(ii) A tire processing facility; or
(iii) A tire retailer; and
(10) Establish at least one (1) tire collection center within
each county served by the used tire program.
(c) A used tire program that receives reimbursements under this
section may:
(1) Contract with a tire processing facility that is approved by
the Director of the Division of Environmental Quality;
(2) Remove or contract for the removal of tires from waste tire
sites within the regional solid waste management district;
(3) Provide incentives for establishing privately operated tire
collection centers for the public; and
(4) Form an inter-district used tire program.
(d) Moneys disbursed from the Used Tire Recycling Fund by the division
for reimbursements under this section shall be:
(1) Distributed as provided under this section only to the used
tire programs that comply with all applicable requirements in this subchapter
related to the operation of used tire programs;
(2) Based on moneys available in the fund, the approved business
plan rate, quarterly financial reports, and other documentation submitted by
the used tire programs; and
(3) Made on a quarterly basis to the used tire programs.
(e)(1) Quarterly disbursements from the fund shall be paid each
quarter from all moneys available for disbursement in that quarter.
04-03-2025 14:05:38 JMB421

As Engrossed: S4/3/25 SB606
(2) If there are insufficient moneys available in a quarter to
make reimbursements for all submitted requests under subsection (f) of this
section, the division shall calculate the total remaining funding available
and allocate the moneys available for reimbursement to each used tire program
based on a pro rata share of each used tire program's reimbursement request
compared to the total moneys available.
(3)(A) The Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission may
increase reimbursement rates if the director recommends an increase because
of one (1) or more of the following:
(i) The relevant consumer price index for the
preceding calendar year exceeded the consumer price index for calendar year
2018; or
(ii) The used tire programs have established an
increase in operation costs.
(B) An increase to any reimbursement rate under subsection
(f) of this section shall not exceed ten percent (10%) each calendar year.
(f) Based on data received from the electronic uniform used tire
manifest system and quarterly reports, the funding for reimbursement for
processing, recycling, or disposing of used tires at the approved business
plan rate may be available from the fund for used tire programs that are in
compliance with all applicable requirements of this subchapter.
(g) At the request of a used tire program that needs operational
assistance or guidance on compliance with this subchapter, the division shall
provide to the used tire program operational assistance or guidance on
compliance with this subchapter.
(h) The division shall:
(1) Develop market opportunities for beneficial use of used tire
material; and
(2) Educate the public on the Used Tire Recycling and
Accountability Program.

8-9-406. [Repealed.]

8-9-407. Electronic uniform Uniform used tire manifest system.
(a) The following entities shall use the electronic uniform used tire
manifest system to accurately report record all information related to the
04-03-2025 14:05:38 JMB421

As Engrossed: S4/3/25 SB606
collection, transportation, distribution, and recycling or disposal of
recyclable tires, waste tires, and used tires culled for resale:
(1) Used tire programs Tire processors;
(2) Tire generators; and
(3) Tire collection centers;
(4) Any person who:
(A) Removes a tire from the used tire program after it is
collected; or
(B) Imports a tire under § 8-9-404(c); and
(5) Commercial generators.
(b) If any of the persons or entities listed in subsection (a) of this
section cannot use the electronic uniform used tire manifest system, the
person or entity may submit to the used tire program an equivalent paper
version which shall be entered into the electronic uniform used tire manifest
system.

8-9-408. Accountability requirements for used tire programs — Business
plans.
(a) On or before December 31, 2017, a used tire program that receives
funding under this subchapter shall provide the Arkansas Department of
Environmental Quality, now the Division of Environmental Quality, with a
business plan that establishes its current operating plan and a proposed
operating plan for calendar year 2018 and approved by its board.
(b) The minimum required information for the business plan is:
(1) Current operation information to include:
(A) An explanation of debt and debt repayment obligations,
including scheduled payments;
(B) A description of equipment used, including type, year
manufactured, debt obligations related to the equipment, and whether it is
leased or owned;
(C) An explanation of contract obligations including the
amount, length, and scope of the contract;
(D) A description of how tires are managed, to include
without limitation collection, transportation, and disposal or recycling;
(E) An explanation of costs, including the cost of tire
collection centers, other collection facilities, trailers, transfer stations,
04-03-2025 14:05:38 JMB421

As Engrossed: S4/3/25 SB606
processing, mileage, fuel, and personnel; and
(F) The number of tires currently on any property owned,
leased, or otherwise controlled by each regional solid waste management
district included in the used tire program; and
(2) Proposed operation costs for calendar year 2018, to include:
(A) A description of how tires will be managed, to include
without limitation collection, storage, transportation, and disposal or
recycling;
(B) Estimated cost of utilities, personnel, equipment,
fees, leases, facilities, and any other costs related to the primary
operation of the used tire program;
(C) The capital improvement and maintenance plan with
estimated expenditures and costs;
(D) The estimated transportation cost including mileage,
fuel, equipment, personnel, utilities, insurance, bonds, and fees;
(E) The locations of all tire collection centers; and
(F) The types of tires managed, to include recyclable
tires, waste tires, and used tires culled for resale.
(c) A used tire program shall submit a revised business plan if there
is a substantial change in the used tire program operations or if the
division requests a revised business plan.
(d) A business plan or revised business plan submitted under this
subchapter is effective after approval by the division or its designee.
(e)(1) The approved business plan or approved revised business plan
shall include the approved business plan rates for each used tire program.
(2)(A) The division shall cooperate with the used tire programs
and other entities to develop each used tire program's approved business plan
rates for recyclable tires and waste tires.
(B) The approved business plan rates shall also use the
size of a tire, including without limitation small tires, large tires, and
extra-large tires, as a factor for determining the approved business plan
rates.
(f) A business plan or revised business plan that results in a
business plan rate increase is subject to review by the Legislative Council.

8-9-409. Performance and efficiency evaluations.
04-03-2025 14:05:38 JMB421

As Engrossed: S4/3/25 SB606
(a) The Division of Environmental Quality shall develop a system to
evaluate and report the performance and efficiency of used tire programs and
the Used Tire Recycling and Accountability Program.
(b) The evaluation and reporting system shall use the following
performance indicators for each used tire program:
(1) The number of:
(A) Recyclable tires;
(B) Waste tires disposed in a landfill; and
(C) Waste tires disposed in a monofill;
(2) The number of reported waste tire sites located in the
regional solid waste management districts that are included in the used tire
program;
(3) Electronic uniform used tire manifest system compliance;
(4) Administrative expenses;
(5) Transportation expenses;
(6) Building, warehouse, and other facilities expenses;
(7) Revenue sources and the amount of revenue received from each
source;
(8) The number, location, and type of tire collection centers;
(9) Any identified operational issues;
(10) The number of enforcement actions against the used tire
program; and
(11) Any other performance indicators that are determined to be
useful to evaluate performance and efficiency.
(c) The evaluations under this section shall be completed on a
biennial basis for each used tire program.

8-9-410. Used tire programs.
(a)(1) In order to address efficiency in tire processing, including
without limitation transportation, there are created four (4) used tire
programs in the state.
(2) The four (4) used tire programs created under subdivision
(a)(1) of this section are composed as follows:
(A) Used Tire Program 1 consists of the following
counties: Benton, Carroll, Boone, Marion, Baxter, Washington, Madison,
Newton, Searcy, Crawford, Franklin, Johnson, Pope, Van Buren, Sebastian,
04-03-2025 14:05:38 JMB421

As Engrossed: S4/3/25 SB606
Logan, Conway, Scott, Yell, and Perry;
(B) Used Tire Program 2 consists of the following
counties: Fulton, Sharp, Randolph, Clay, Izard, Lawrence, Greene, Stone,
Independence, Jackson, Craighead, Mississippi, Cleburne, Faulkner, White,
Poinsett, Woodruff, Cross, Pulaski, and Crittenden;
(C) Used Tire Program 3 consists of the following
counties: Polk, Montgomery, Sevier, Howard, Pike, Clark, Little River,
Hempstead, Nevada, Miller, Lafayette, Saline, Dallas, Ouachita, Union,
Garland, Hot Spring, and Columbia; and
(D) Used Tire Program 4 consists of the following
counties: Grant, Jefferson, Arkansas, Phillips, Cleveland, Lincoln, Desha,
Calhoun, Bradley, Drew, Ashley, Lonoke, Prairie, Monroe, St. Francis, Lee,
and Chicot.
(b)(1) Each new used tire program is governed by a tire accountability
board that is composed of eleven (11) members:
(A) Five (5) county judges, elected by the county judges
of the used tire program;
(B) Two (2) county judges, appointed from the two (2) most
populous counties in the used tire program according to the most recent
federal census; and
(C) Four (4) mayors, elected by the mayors of all of the
cities in the used tire program.
(2) Each member of the tire accountability board shall serve for
a term of three (3) years.
(3) The members of the tire accountability board shall draw lots
for staggered terms at the first organizational meeting.
(4) A vacancy on the tire accountability board shall be filled
through the process described in the bylaws of the tire accountability board.
(c)(1) A tire accountability board shall:
(A) Elect a chair and a vice-chair at an organizational
meeting;
(B) Develop bylaws to govern the tire accountability
board, including without limitation rules related to the replacement of
members of the tire accountability board in the event of a vacancy; and
(C) Submit a business plan to the Division of
Environmental Quality for approval on or before September 1, 2023.
04-03-2025 14:05:38 JMB421

As Engrossed: S4/3/25 SB606
(2) The division shall approve or seek additional information
regarding the business plan submitted under subdivision (c)(1)(C) of this
section within sixty (60) days.
(d) The tire accountability board in each of the used tire programs
may enter into an interlocal agreement to determine the highest level of
efficiency regarding tire processing in the respective used tire program.
(e) Arkansas Legislative Audit shall audit the four (4) used tire
programs on the following schedule:
(1) Used Tire Program 1 and Used Tire Program 3 every odd-
numbered year; and
(2) Used Tire Program 2 and Used Tire Program 4 every even-
numbered year.

8-9-411. Tire transporters — Licenses.
(a) A tire transporter shall meet the following requirements to
perform or be compensated be licensed for any duties under this subchapter
related to the administration and operation of a used tire program:
(1) Obtain for each vehicle a license;
(2) Obtain for each vehicle a tire transporter number provided
by the Division of Environmental Quality used for the electronic uniform used
tire manifest system;
(3) Provide proof that each vehicle has passed an annual safety
inspection;
(4) Provide proof of financial responsibility for each vehicle
and authorized driver;
(5) Provide a bond in the amount of ten thousand dollars
($10,000);
(6) Establish that each authorized driver has completed training
for the electronic uniform used tire manifest system; and
(7)(6) Pay a fee of fifty dollars ($50.00) for each vehicle that
is licensed.
(b) For each tire transporter licensed under this section, the
division shall assign a tire transporter number and include the tire
transporter information in the electronic uniform used tire manifest system.
(c)(1) If a tire transporter is found to have not complied with this
subchapter, the tire transporter's license shall be suspended for three (3)
04-03-2025 14:05:38 JMB421

As Engrossed: S4/3/25 SB606
months.
(2) If the license of a tire transporter is suspended more than
one (1) time in three (3) years, the tire transporter's license shall be
revoked and the tire transporter is ineligible for a tire transporter license
for three (3) years.

8-9-412. Additional fees.
(a) A used tire program may charge an additional fee for the
collection and recycling of extra-large tires from sources other than
registered tire retailers and for any tires in excess of the maximum under §
8-9-414(b)(7).
(b) If a used tire program charges an additional fee under this
section, the fee shall be collected and retained by the used tire program for
costs related to the processing of extra-large tires.

8-9-413. Applicability.
The fees imposed by this subchapter shall not apply to:
(1) Large retreaded retreaded tires;
(2) Tires included as part of the equipment of a new vehicle; or
(3) Tires included as part of the equipment of a used vehicle if
included on the used vehicle at the time of sale and in the sales price of
the used vehicle.

8-9-414. Powers and duties of the Arkansas Pollution Control and
Ecology Commission.
(a) The Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission shall
promulgate rules to carry out the intent and purposes of this subchapter.
(b) The rules shall:
(1)(A) Except as provided under subdivision (b)(1)(B) of this
section, provide for the administration of permits for tire processing
facilities, tire collection centers, commercial tire generators, and any
other person or entity that collects, receives, processes, recycles, or
disposes of used waste tires regulated under this subchapter with the maximum
permit fee not to exceed two hundred fifty dollars ($250) annually fees
calculated to generate revenues not to exceed the reasonable administrative
costs of licensing, evaluating, and taking action on permit applications and
04-03-2025 14:05:38 JMB421

As Engrossed: S4/3/25 SB606
costs of implementing and enforcing the terms and conditions of permits and
licenses.
(B) The maximum permit fee under this subdivision (b)(1)
shall not apply to tire transporters but shall provide for the administration
of licensing for tire transports;
(2) Establish standards for tire processing facilities, tire
collection centers, tire transporters, and beneficial use projects;
(3) Establish procedures for administering reimbursements to
used tire programs under § 8-9-405;
(4)(3) Unless otherwise provided by law, authorize the final
disposition of waste tires at a permitted solid waste disposal facility if
the waste tires have been cut into sufficiently small parts for proper
disposal and in compliance with this subchapter and all other applicable
provisions in this title; and
(5)(4) Establish procedures for administering the electronic
uniform used tire manifest system;.
(6) Establish accountability procedures for the sustainability
of used tire programs operated under this subchapter; and
(7)(A) Establish the number of tires that each individual who is
a resident of a regional solid waste management district may discard monthly
without a fee.
(B) The maximum number of tires under this subdivision
(b)(7) shall not be more than four (4) tires per month.
(c) The commission may:
(1) Develop an alternative tire transporter licensing program to
be administered by used tire programs, regional solid waste management
boards, or both;
(2) Promulgate rules that are necessary to administer the fees
and reimbursement rates for services provided under this subchapter by the
used tire programs; and
(3) Clarify and add definitions for sizes of tires using
technical information and specifications.
(d)(1)(c)(1) The commission shall encourage the establishment of
voluntary tire collection centers where used tires generated in Arkansas can
be deposited.
(2) The voluntary tire collection centers shall include without
04-03-2025 14:05:38 JMB421

As Engrossed: S4/3/25 SB606
limitation tire retailers, tire processing facilities, and solid waste
disposal facilities.
(3) The voluntary tire collection centers shall not include the
collection of tires generated by a tire manufacturer.
(e)(d) The commission shall not prohibit the disposal of whole waste
tires in landfills or monofills for three (3) years from August 1, 2017 and
new or expanded tire monofill permits.
(f) The commission shall waive the imposition of any permit fee
imposed under this subchapter on any used tire program created by § 8-9-410.

8-9-415. Permitting, licensing, inspections, procedures, enforcement,
and penalties.
(a) A person who receives funding under this subchapter, tire Tire
collection centers, tire retailers, tire processing facilities, tire
transporters, tire generators, commercial generators, used tires regulated
under this subchapter, and waste tire sites are subject to:
(1) All provisions in § 8-1-101 et seq., § 8-1-201 et seq., § 8-
1-301 et seq., § 8-4-101 et seq., and § 8-4-201 et seq., concerning permits,
licensing, inspections, and procedures;
(2) Sections 8-6-204, 8-6-205, 8-6-207(a)(6), and 8-9-105
concerning penalties and enforcement; and
(3) All applicable rules promulgated by the Arkansas Pollution
Control and Ecology Commission.;
(4)(A) Tire retailers and tire wholesalers who sell used tires
as a commodity shall do so only from stock that has been sorted, marked,
classified, and arranged in an organized manner for sale to a consumer.
(B)(i) Tires stored outside shall be monitored for
vectors.
(ii) Appropriate vector control measures shall be
utilized at least once every two (2) weeks; and
(5) Tire processors shall maintain received or generated uniform
used tire manifests for a period of three (3) years to be available upon
request by the division.
(b) A used tire program is subject to penalties and enforcement under
this subchapter for noncompliance with this subchapter to include without
limitation:
04-03-2025 14:05:38 JMB421

As Engrossed: S4/3/25 SB606
(1) Failure to use the electronic uniform used tire manifest
system;
(2) Failure to submit accurate information to the electronic
uniform used tire manifest system;
(3) Failure to submit an approved business plan on or before
July 1, 2018;
(4) Failure to submit a revised business plan as required under
§ 8-9-408(c);
(5) Failure to submit an approved revised business plan within
three (3) months after submission; or
(6) Failure to provide documentation or reports required to be
filed with the Division of Environmental Quality under this subchapter.
(c)(1) If a used tire program fails to submit a business plan that is
approved by the Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality or the division
on or before July 1, 2018, the used tire program and all regional solid waste
management boards included in the used tire program on July 1, 2018, are:
(A) Ineligible to receive funding under this subchapter
and from the Used Tire Recycling Fund;
(B) Prohibited from administering and operating a used
tire program; and
(C) Prohibited from imposing any fees to support the
administration and operation of a used tire program.
(2)(A) The division may designate a qualified entity to perform
the duties related to the operation and administration of a used tire program
deemed ineligible under subdivision (c)(1) of this section.
(B) A qualified entity that is designated to perform the
duties related to the operation and administration of a used tire program
under this subsection shall operate the used tire program in compliance with
this subchapter.
(C) If the qualified entity performs the duties related to
the operation and administration of the used tire program in compliance with
this subchapter, the qualified entity is eligible to receive funding under
this subchapter and from the fund.
(d)(b) In addition to any other penalty provided by law, a tire
processing facility permit or a tire collection center permit shall may be
suspended or revoked by the Division of Environmental Quality for
04-03-2025 14:05:38 JMB421

As Engrossed: S4/3/25 SB606
noncompliance with this subchapter.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code Title 8, Chapter 9, Subchapter 4, is amended
to add an additional section to read as follows:
8-9-416. Cost recovery — Liability for costs — Immunity from
liability.
(a) Any of the following shall be liable to the state for all costs of
waste tire abatement under this subchapter:
(1) The owner or operator of a waste tire site;
(2) Any person that, at the time of disposal of any waste tires,
owns or operates a waste tire site;
(3) Any generator of tires that creates a waste tire site;
(4) Any tire transporter that creates or adds to a waste tire
site; or
(5) Any tire processor or landfill that creates or adds to a
waste tire site.
(b)(1) A person shall not be liable under this subchapter for damages
as a result of actions taken or omitted in the course of rendering care,
assistance, or advice at the direction of the Department of Energy and
Environment, the Secretary of the Department of Energy and Environment, or
the Division of Environmental Quality with respect to an incident creating a
danger to public health, safety, or welfare or the environment as a result of
a waste tire site.
(2)(A) This subsection shall not preclude liability for damages
as a result of gross negligence or intentional misconduct on the part of the
person, nor shall this subsection preclude liability for damages and costs of
waste tire abatement of any person liable for such damages and costs under
subsection (a) of this section.
(B) For the purposes of subdivision (b)(2)(A) of this
section, reckless, willful, or wanton misconduct shall constitute gross
negligence.
(c)(1) A person performing waste tire abatement under this subchapter
as a contractor for the division shall not be liable under this subchapter or
under any other state law to any person for injuries, costs, damages,
expenses, or other liability, including without limitation claims for
indemnification or contribution and claims by third parties for death,
04-03-2025 14:05:38 JMB421

As Engrossed: S4/3/25 SB606
personal injury, illness, loss of or damage to property, or economic loss
resulting from the abatement.
(2) However, this subsection shall not apply in an action that
is caused by the conduct of the person performing abatement that is negligent
or grossly negligent or which constitutes intentional misconduct.
(d)(1) A state employee or an employee of a political subdivision who
provides services relating to abatement while acting within the scope of his
or her authority as a governmental employee shall not be liable, subject to
the other provisions of this section, to any person for injuries, costs,
damages, expenses, or other liability, including without limitation claims
for indemnification or contribution and claims by third parties for death,
personal injury, illness, loss of or damage to property, or economic loss
resulting from the abatement.
(2) However, this subsection shall not apply in an action that
is caused by the conduct of the person performing abatement that is negligent
or grossly negligent or which constitutes intentional misconduct.
(e)(1) Subsection (c) or subsection (d) of this section does not
affect the liability of any person under warranty law.
(2) The section does not affect the liability of an employer
performing abatement to any employee of any such employer under any provision
of law, including any provision of any law relating to workers' compensation.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 8-6-1002(b)(3), concerning the Landfill
Post-Closure Trust Fund, is amended to read as follows:
(3) The fund shall be administered by the division and may be
used by the division to complete all activities necessary for the closure of
a permitted waste tire processing or disposal site that is owned or operated
by a regional solid waste management district or formerly owned and operated
by a used tire program if the division determines that the district lacks
sufficient funds to complete closure of the permitted waste tire processing
or disposal site.

SECTION 4. Effective July 1, 2026, Arkansas Code § 19-5-1148 is
repealed.
19-5-1148. Used Tire Recycling Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
04-03-2025 14:05:38 JMB421

As Engrossed: S4/3/25 SB606
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a trust fund to
be known as the “Used Tire Recycling Fund”.
(b)(1) The Department of Finance and Administration shall deposit into
the State Treasury ninety-three percent (93%) of the moneys collected under §
8-9-404 to the credit of the Used Tire Recycling Fund.
(2) The Used Tire Recycling Fund shall consist of:
(A) Penalties assessed and collected under the Used Tire
Recycling and Accountability Act, § 8-9-401 et seq.;
(B) Interest, earnings, and any other revenues as may be
authorized by law;
(C) Any United States Government moneys designated for
deposit into the Used Tire Recycling Fund;
(D) Any gift or donation to the Used Tire Recycling Fund;
and
(E) Those special revenues specified in § 8-9-404 and §
19-6-301(165).
(3) The Used Tire Recycling Fund shall not include:
(A) Five percent (5%) of the rim removal fee retained for
administrative costs by tire retailers under § 8-9-404(a)(5)(B) and
commercial generators under § 8-9-404(d)(5)(B);
(B) The percentage of net special revenue deducted and
deposited to the credit of the Special Revenue Fund Account of the State
Apportionment Fund under § 19-5-203; or
(C) Seven percent (7%) deducted from the proceeds of fees
imposed under § 8-9-404 and deposited into the Division of Environmental
Quality Fee Trust Fund under § 8-9-404(b)(1)(B), § 8-9-404(c)(3)(A)(ii), and
§ 8-9-404(d)(7)(B).
(c)(1) At least ninety percent (90%) of the moneys available in the
Used Tire Recycling Fund each fiscal year shall be used by the Division of
Environmental Quality to provide reimbursements to used tire programs, to
administer the Used Tire Recycling and Accountability Program, and to perform
other duties under the Used Tire Recycling and Accountability Act, § 8-9-401
et seq.
(2) The Director of the Division of Environmental Quality may
use not more than ten percent (10%) of the moneys available in the Used Tire
Recycling Fund each fiscal year:
04-03-2025 14:05:38 JMB421

As Engrossed: S4/3/25 SB606
(A) For waste tire site abatement aid;
(B) For the development, implementation, and maintenance
of the electronic uniform used tire manifest system; and
(C) To provide market and economic stimulus incentives.

SECTION 5. Effective January 1, 2026, Arkansas Code Title 19, Chapter
5, Subchapter 11, is amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
19-5-1161. Waste Tire Abatement Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a trust fund to
be known as the "Waste Tire Abatement Fund".
(b)(1) The Department of Finance and Administration shall deposit into
the State Treasury the moneys collected under § 8-9-404 to the credit of the
Waste Tire Abatement Fund.
(2) No more than five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000)
annually, with an annual escalator not to exceed two percent (2%), shall be
transferred from the Waste Tire Abatement Fund to the Division of
Environmental Quality Fee Trust Fund to be used for administration expenses.
(3) The Waste Tire Abatement Fund shall consist of:
(A) Penalties assessed and collected under the Tire
Management and Recycling Act, § 8-9-401 et seq.;
(B) Interest, earnings, and any other revenues as may be
authorized by law;
(C) Any United States Government moneys designated for
deposit into the Waste Tire Abatement Fund;
(D) Any gift or donation to the Waste Tire Abatement Fund;
and
(E) Those special revenues specified in §§ 8-9-404 and 19-
6-301(165).
(4) The Waste Tire Abatement Fund shall not include:
(A) Two percent (2%) of the fees retained for
administrative costs by tire retailers under § 8-9-404(b)(5)(B); or
(B) The percentage of net special revenue deducted and
deposited to the credit of the Special Revenue Fund Account of the State
Apportionment Fund under § 19-5-203.
(c) The Waste Tire Abatement Fund moneys shall be used:
04-03-2025 14:05:38 JMB421

As Engrossed: S4/3/25 SB606
(A) For the administration of the Tire Management
Recycling Program by the Division of Environmental Quality;
(B) For waste tire site abatement grants to entities
eligible under § 8-9-404(d)(1);
(C) To provide equipment grants and to promote economic
stimulus incentives;
(D) For funding of beneficial use projects and other waste
tire-related projects; and
(E) To ensure that waste tires handled under the Tire
Management Recycling Program that are collected by or sent through a tire
collection center or a tire processing facility for beneficial use are not
abandoned or discarded.

SECTION 6. DO NOT CODIFY. TEMPORARY LANGUAGE. Distribution of funds
from Used Tire Recycling Fund.
(a)(1) The chief fiscal officer of the Department of Energy and
Environment shall determine the total moneys available on February 28, 2026,
at 11:59 p.m. that were collected under § 8-9-404(a)(1) rim removal fees.
(2) Until January 1, 2026, the rim removal fee under § 8-9-404
shall remain at three dollars ($3.00) for each new tire that replaces a tire
removed from a rim and one dollar ($1.00) for each used tire that replaces
the tire removed from the rim.
(3) On January 1, 2026, the rim removal fee under § 8-9-404
shall expire and the tire retailer fee shall be imposed at the rate of one
dollar and fifty cents ($1.50) for each new tire.
(b) The moneys available under subdivision (a)(1) of this section
shall be used to reimburse used tire programs for used tire recycling and
disposal costs at the approved business rate through the second quarter of
fiscal year 2026.
(c) Any moneys remaining after all used tire programs have been
reimbursed, including any interest earnings or investment earnings on the
moneys available under subdivision (a)(1) of this section shall be
transferred to the Waste Tire Abatement Fund.
(d) This section expires after all used tire programs have received
reimbursement for the fourth quarter of fiscal year 2025 under subdivision
(a)(2) of this section.
04-03-2025 14:05:38 JMB421

As Engrossed: S4/3/25 SB606

SECTION 7. EFFECTIVE DATE.
(a) Section 4 concerning the repeal of the Used Tire Recycling Fund
shall be effective on July 1, 2026.
(b) Section 5 concerning the creation of the Waste Tire Abatement Fund
shall be effective on January 1, 2026.
(c) The fee that may be collected and charged by a tire retailer for
the cost of legally hauling and disposing of or recycling the waste tires and
residuals shall be effective on the effective date of this act.

/s/B. Davis

























04-03-2025 14:05:38 JMB421